Washington statutes.
RCW 44.20.030

Session laws—Separate copies to be available.

The statute law committee, after every legislative session, whether regular or special, shall have available, on demand, for temporary use separate copies of each act filed in the office of secretary of state within ten days after the filing thereof.

[ 2006 c 46 s 1; 1982 1st ex.s. c 32 s 3; 1969 c 6 s 2; 1961 c 21 s 1; 1933 ex.s. c 31 s 1; 1933 c 27 s 1; 1925 ex.s. c 35 s 1; 1907 c 136 s 3; RRS s 8198.]

NOTES:

Statute law committee: Chapter 1.08 RCW.